Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Records

271B.16-010.
Corporate records.

A corporation shall keep as permanent records minutes of all meetings of its shareholders and board of directors, a record of all actions taken by the shareholders or board of directors without a meeting, and a record of all actions taken by a committee of the board of directors in place of the board of directors on behalf of the corporation.

A corporation shall maintain appropriate accounting records.

A corporation or its agent shall maintain a record of its shareholders, in a form that permits preparation of a list of the names and addresses of all shareholders, by class of shares showing the number and class of shares held by each.

A corporation shall maintain its records in written form or in another form capable of conversion into written form within a reasonable time.

A corporation shall keep a copy of the following records at its principal office:

Its articles or restated articles of incorporation and all amendments to them currently in effect;

Its bylaws or restated bylaws and all amendments to them currently in effect;

Resolutions adopted by its board of directors creating one (1) or more classes or series of shares, and fixing their relative rights, preferences, and limitations, if shares issued pursuant to those resolutions are outstanding;

The minutes of all shareholders’ meetings, and records of all action taken by shareholders without a meeting, for the past three (3) years;

All written communications to shareholders generally within the past three (3) years, including the financial statements furnished for the past three (3) years under KRS

271B.16-200

;

A list of the names and business addresses of its current directors and officers; and

Its most recent annual report delivered to the Secretary of State under KRS

14A.6-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 167, effective January 1, 1989; 2010, ch. 151, § 123, effective January 1, 2011.

271B.16-020.
Inspection of records by shareholders.

A shareholder of a corporation shall be entitled to inspect and copy, during regular business hours at the corporation’s principal office, any of the records of the corporation described in subsection (5) of KRS

271B.16-010

if he gives the corporation written notice of his demand at least five (5) business days before the date on which he wishes to inspect and copy.

A shareholder of a corporation shall be entitled to inspect and copy during regular business hours at a reasonable location specified by the corporation any of the following records of the corporation if the shareholder meets the requirements of subsection (3) of this section and gives the corporation written notice of his demand at least five (5) business days before the date on which he wishes to inspect and copy:

Excerpts from minutes of any meeting of the board of directors, records of any action of a committee of the board of directors while acting in place of the board of directors on behalf of the corporation, minutes of any meeting of the shareholders, and records of action taken by the shareholders or board of directors without a meeting, to the extent not subject to inspection under subsection (1) of this section;

Accounting records of the corporation; and

The record of shareholders.

A shareholder may inspect and copy the records described in subsection (2) of this section only if:

His demand is made in good faith and for a proper purpose;

He describes with reasonable particularity his purpose and the records he desires to inspect; and

The records are directly connected with his purpose.

The right of inspection granted by this section shall not be abolished or limited by a corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws.

This section shall not affect:

The right of a shareholder to inspect records under KRS

271B.7-200

or, if the shareholder is in litigation with the corporation, to the same extent as any other litigant;

The power of a court, independently of this chapter, to compel the production of corporate records for examination.

For purposes of this section, “shareholder” includes a beneficial owner whose shares are held in a voting trust or by a nominee on his behalf.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 168, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.16-030.
Scope of inspection right.

A shareholder’s agent or attorney shall have the same inspection and copying rights as the shareholder he represents.

The right to copy records under KRS

271B.16-020

shall include, if reasonable, the right to receive copies made by photographic, xerographic, or other means.

The corporation may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of any documents provided to the shareholder. The charge shall not exceed the estimated cost of production or reproduction of the records.

The corporation may comply with a shareholder’s demand to inspect the record of shareholders under subsection (2)(c) of KRS

271B.16-020

by providing him with a list of its shareholders that was compiled no earlier than the date of the shareholder’s demand.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 169, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.16-040.
Court-ordered inspection.

If the corporation does not allow a shareholder who complies with subsection (1) of KRS

271B.16-020

to inspect and copy any records required by that subsection to be available for inspection, the Circuit Court of the county where the corporation’s principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located may summarily order inspection and copying of records demanded at the corporation’s expense upon application of the shareholder.

If a corporation does not within a reasonable time allow a shareholder to inspect and copy any other record, the shareholder who complies with subsections (2) and (3) of KRS

271B.16-020

may apply to the Circuit Court of the county where the corporation’s principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located for an order to permit inspection and copying of the records demanded. The court shall dispose of an application under this subsection on an expedited basis.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it shall also order the corporation to pay the shareholder’s costs (including reasonable counsel fees) incurred to obtain the order unless the corporation proves that it refused inspection in good faith because it had a reasonable basis for doubt about the right of the shareholder to inspect the records demanded.

If the court orders inspection and copying of the records demanded, it may impose reasonable restrictions on the use or distribution of the records by the demanding shareholder.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 170, effective January 1, 1989.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, Recent Amendments to Kentucky Business Entity Laws, Vol. 71, No. 5, Sept. 2007, Ky. Bench & Bar 25.